Washington statutes.
RCW 39.58.090

Authority to secure deposits in accordance with chapter—Bonds and securities for deposits dispensed with.

All institutions located in this state which are permitted by the statutes of this state to hold and receive public funds shall have power to secure such deposits in accordance with this chapter. Except as provided in this chapter, no bond or other security shall be required of or given by any public depositary for any public funds on deposit.

[ 1996 c 256 s 10; 1984 c 177 s 15; 1969 ex.s. c 193 s 9.]